Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-760
Appropriate court, defined.

The phrase appropriate court as used in the Agreement on Detainers shall, with reference to the courts of this state, mean any court with criminal jurisdiction in the matter involved.

Laws 1963, c. 154, § 2, p. 551.